Idaho, session 2026, H0914.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 26, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-2616, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-2616. TEMPORARY MORATORIUM ON RULEMAKING AND FEES. (1) Notwith-
standing any other provision of law to the contrary, for the period July 1,
2026, through June 30, 2031, the division of occupational and professional
licenses, including the administrator of such division and the boards and
commissions within such division, shall not be authorized to promulgate any
additional administrative rules or to increase any occupational licensing
fee.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section,
the division of occupational and professional licenses, including the ad-
ministrator of such division and the boards and commissions within such di-
vision, shall be authorized to conduct rulemaking for the purpose of repeal-
ing existing regulations or removing a regulatory burden.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 26, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-2617, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-2617. MIGRATION OF DIVISION OF OCCUPATIONAL AND PROFESSIONAL LI-
CENSES RULES INTO STATUTE. No later than December 31, 2026, the division
of occupational and professional licenses shall submit to the legislative
services office proposed legislation that transfers all division of occu-
pational and professional licenses administrative rule chapters less than
eight (8) pages into statute.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.